Virginia statutes. Title 10.1. Conservation.
Article 1. General Provisions.
§ 10.1-1316.1.
Severe ozone nonattainment areas; fees.

Except as provided in subsection C, any owner of a stationary source that emits or has the potential to emit 25 tons or more per year of volatile organic compounds or 25 tons or more of nitrogen oxides and is located in an area designated by the U.S. Environmental Protection Agency as a severe ozone nonattainment area shall pay a fee to the Department for deposit in the Vehicle Emissions Inspection Program Fund, established pursuant to § 46.2-1182.2 to be used for air quality evaluation and improvements, if the area fails to attain the ambient air quality standard for ozone by the applicable attainment date established pursuant to 42 U.S.C. §§ 7502 and 7511 of the Clean Air Act. Such fees shall be assessed for emissions in each calendar year beginning in the year after the attainment date and for each calendar year thereafter as set forth in this section and shall continue until the area is redesignated as an attainment area for the ozone standard.

The fee shall be determined in accordance with the following:

The fee shall equal $5,000, adjusted in accordance with subdivision B 3, per ton of volatile organic compounds or nitrogen oxides emitted by the stationary source during the previous calendar year in excess of 80 percent of the baseline amount, computed under subdivision B 2.

For purposes of this section, the baseline amount shall be the lower of (i) the amount of actual volatile organic compounds or nitrogen oxide emissions or (ii) the amount of volatile organic compounds or nitrogen oxide emissions allowed under the permit applicable to the stationary source during the attainment year, or, if no such permit has been issued for the attainment year, the amount of volatile organic compounds or nitrogen oxide emissions allowed under the applicable implementation plan during the attainment year. The Department may calculate the baseline amount over a period of more than one calendar year, provided such determination is consistent with federal requirements.

The fee amount under subdivision B 1 shall be adjusted each year beginning in 1991 by the percentage, if any, by which the Consumer Price Index for the most recent calendar year ending before the beginning of such year exceeds the Consumer Price Index for the calendar year 1989. The Consumer Price Index for any calendar year is the average of the Consumer Price Index for all urban consumers published by the U.S. Department of Labor as of the close of the 12-month period ending on August 31 of each calendar year. The revision of the Consumer Price Index that is most consistent with the Consumer Price Index for the calendar year 1989 shall be used.

Notwithstanding any provision of this section, no owner shall be required to pay any fee under subsection A with respect to emissions during any year that is treated as an extension year under 42 U.S.C. § 7511(a)(5) of the Clean Air Act and no owner shall be required to pay any fee under subsection A if such fees would not otherwise be imposed pursuant to 42 U.S.C. § 7511d.

Payment is due by August 31 of each year. The Department shall issue annual notices of the fees to owners on or before August 1 of each year. Each notice shall include a summary of the data on which the fee is based. The Board may establish additional procedures for the assessment and collection of such fees. The failure to pay within 90 days from the receipt of the notice shall be grounds to institute a collection action against the owner of the stationary source.

Fees collected pursuant to this section shall not supplant or reduce the general fund appropriation to the Department.

These fees shall be used to pay expenses related to air quality monitoring and evaluation in the Commonwealth and measures to improve air quality in areas designated by the U.S. Environmental Protection Agency as severe nonattainment areas. The fees that may be generated may be used for matching grants.

History.

2004, c. 408.

§ 10.1-1317.
Judicial review of regulations of Board.

The validity of any regulation may be determined through judicial review in accordance with the provisions of the Administrative Process Act (§ 2.2-4000 et seq.).

History.

1971, Ex. Sess., c. 91, § 10-17.23:1; 1986, c. 615; 1988, c. 891.

Research References.

Bryson on Virginia Civil Procedure (Matthew Bender). Chapter 2 Potential Jurisdiction. § 2.03 Courts. Bryson.

§ 10.1-1318.
(Effective until July 1, 2022) Appeal from decision of Board.

Any owner aggrieved by a final decision of the Board under §

10.1-1309

, §

10.1-1322

or subsection D of §

10.1-1307

is entitled to judicial review thereof in accordance with the provisions of the Administrative Process Act (§ 2.2-4000 et seq.).

Any person who has participated, in person or by submittal of written comments, in the public comment process related to a final decision of the Board under §

10.1-1322

and who has exhausted all available administrative remedies for review of the Board’s decision, shall be entitled to judicial review of the Board’s decision in accordance with the provisions of the Administrative Process Act (§ 2.2-4000 et seq.) if such person meets the standard for obtaining judicial review of a case or controversy pursuant to Article III of the United States Constitution. A person shall be deemed to meet such standard if (i) such person has suffered an actual or imminent injury which is an invasion of a legally protected interest and which is concrete and particularized; (ii) such injury is fairly traceable to the decision of the Board and not the result of the independent action of some third party not before the court; and (iii) such injury will likely be redressed by a favorable decision by the court.

History.

1971, Ex. Sess., c. 91, § 10-17.23:2; 1986, c. 615; 1988, c. 891; 1993, c. 997; 1996, c. 1032.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1996, c. 1032, cl. 4 provides: “[t]hat the second enactment of this act shall not be effective unless and until a final and unappealable decision of a court of competent jurisdiction has declared that subsection B of §

10.1-1318

as it is currently effective does not meet the requirements for state program approval under Title V of the federal Clean Air Act or regulations promulgated thereunder with respect to standing to seek judicial review of state permitting decisions.”

Acts 1996, c. 1032, cl. 5, as added by Acts 1997, c. 520, cl. 1, provides: “That the ‘final and unappealable decision of a court of competent jurisdiction’ referred to in enactment clauses 3 and 4 was rendered by the United States Supreme Court in the case of Commonwealth vs. Browner on January 21, 1997.”

The 1996 amendment

rewrote subsection B which formerly read: “Any person who is aggrieved by a final decision of the Board under §

10.1-1322

, who participated, in person or by submittal of written comments, in the public comment process related to the Board’s decision and who has exhausted all available administrative remedies for review of the Board’s decision, shall be entitled to judicial review of the Board’s decision in accordance with the provisions of the Administrative Process Act (§ 9-6.14:1 et seq.).
The person invoking jurisdiction under this subsection bears the burden of establishing that (i) such person has suffered an actual, threatened or imminent injury; (ii) such injury is an invasion of an immediate, legally protected, pecuniary and substantial interest which is concrete and particularized; (iii) such injury is fairly traceable to the decision of the Board and not the result of the action of some third party not before the court; and (iv) such injury will likely be redressed by a favorable decision by the court.” For effective date, see Editor’s note.

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendment by c. 356 in subsection A and in subsection B in the first sentence, substituted “Department” for “Board” twice and “Department’s” for “Board’s” twice.

Law Review.

For an article reviewing key environmental developments at the federal and state levels during the period from June 1996 to June 1998, see 32 U. Rich. L. Rev. 1217 (1998).

For 2007 annual survey article, “Environmental Law,” see 42 U. Rich. L. Rev. 383 (2007).

For article, “Construction Law,” see 45 U. Rich. L. Rev. 227 (2010).

Research References.

Bryson on Virginia Civil Procedure (Matthew Bender). Chapter 2 Potential Jurisdiction. § 2.03 Courts. Bryson.

§ 10.1-1318.
(Effective July 1, 2022) Appeal from decision of Department.

Any owner aggrieved by a final decision of the Department under §

10.1-1309

, §

10.1-1322

or subsection D of §

10.1-1307

is entitled to judicial review thereof in accordance with the provisions of the Administrative Process Act (§ 2.2-4000 et seq.).

Any person who has participated, in person or by submittal of written comments, in the public comment process related to a final decision of the Department under §

10.1-1322

and who has exhausted all available administrative remedies for review of the Department’s decision, shall be entitled to judicial review of the Department’s decision in accordance with the provisions of the Administrative Process Act (§ 2.2-4000 et seq.) if such person meets the standard for obtaining judicial review of a case or controversy pursuant to Article III of the United States Constitution. A person shall be deemed to meet such standard if (i) such person has suffered an actual or imminent injury which is an invasion of a legally protected interest and which is concrete and particularized; (ii) such injury is fairly traceable to the decision of the Board and not the result of the independent action of some third party not before the court; and (iii) such injury will likely be redressed by a favorable decision by the court.

History.

1971, Ex. Sess., c. 91, § 10-17.23:2; 1986, c. 615; 1988, c. 891; 1993, c. 997; 1996, c. 1032; 2022, c. 356.

§ 10.1-1319.
Appeal to Court of Appeals.

The Commonwealth or any party aggrieved by any final decision of the judge shall have, regardless of the amount involved, the right to appeal to the Court of Appeals. The procedure shall be the same as that provided by law concerning appeals and supersedeas.

History.

1966, c. 497, § 10-17.28; 1984, c. 703; 1988, c. 891.

§ 10.1-1320.
(Effective until July 1, 2022) Penalties; chapter not to affect right to relief or to maintain action.

Any owner knowingly violating any provision of this chapter, Board regulation or order, or any permit condition shall upon conviction be guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be subject to a fine of not more than $10,000 for each violation within the discretion of the court. Each day of violation shall constitute a separate offense.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to abridge, limit, impair, create, enlarge or otherwise affect substantively or procedurally the right of any person to damages or other relief on account of injury to persons or property.

History.

1966, c. 497, § 10-17.29; 1972, c. 781; 1973, c. 251; 1988, c. 891; 1993, c. 13; 1995, c. 135.

Cross references.

As to statute of limitation, see §

19.2-8

.

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendment by c. 356 inserted “Department” in the first paragraph and made a stylistic change.

§ 10.1-1320.
(Effective July 1, 2022) Penalties; chapter not to affect right to relief or to maintain action.

Any owner knowingly violating any provision of this chapter, Board regulation, or Department order, or any permit condition shall upon conviction be guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be subject to a fine of not more than $10,000 for each violation within the discretion of the court. Each day of violation shall constitute a separate offense.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to abridge, limit, impair, create, enlarge or otherwise affect substantively or procedurally the right of any person to damages or other relief on account of injury to persons or property.

History.

1966, c. 497, § 10-17.29; 1972, c. 781; 1973, c. 251; 1988, c. 891; 1993, c. 13; 1995, c. 135; 2022, c. 356.

§ 10.1-1320.1.
(Effective until July 1, 2022) Duty of attorney for the Commonwealth.

It shall be the duty of every attorney for the Commonwealth to whom the Director or his authorized representative has reported any violation of this chapter or any regulation or order of the Board, to cause proceedings to be prosecuted without delay for the fines and penalties in such cases.

History.

1990, c. 238.

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendment by c. 356 substituted “any violation of (i) this chapter, (ii) any regulation of the Board, or (iii) order of the Department” for “any violation of this chapter or any regulation or order of the Board.”

§ 10.1-1320.1.
(Effective July 1, 2022) Duty of attorney for the Commonwealth.

It shall be the duty of every attorney for the Commonwealth to whom the Director or his authorized representative has reported any violation of (i) this chapter, (ii) any regulation of the Board, or (iii) order of the Department, to cause proceedings to be prosecuted without delay for the fines and penalties in such cases.

History.

1990, c. 238; 2022, c. 356.

§ 10.1-1321.
Local ordinances.

Existing local ordinances adopted prior to July 1, 1972, shall continue in force; however, in the event of a conflict between a Board regulation and a local ordinance adopted prior to July 1, 1972, the Board regulation shall govern, except when the conflicting local ordinance is more stringent.

The governing body of any locality proposing to adopt an ordinance, or an amendment to an existing ordinance, relating to air pollution after June 30, 1972, shall first obtain the approval of the Board as to the provisions of the ordinance or amendment. No ordinance or amendment, except an ordinance or amendment pertaining solely to open burning, shall be approved by the Board which regulates any emission source that is required to register with the Board or to obtain a permit pursuant to this chapter and the Board’s regulations.

History.

1966, c. 497, § 10-17.30; 1972, c. 781; 1988, c. 891; 1994, c. 358.

Law Review.

For comment, “Waste to Energy: Environmental and Local Government Concerns,” see 19 U. Rich. L. Rev. 373 (1985).

§ 10.1-1321.1.
When application for permit considered complete.

No application for a permit for a new or major modified stationary air pollution source shall be considered complete unless the applicant has provided the Director with notification from the governing body of the county, city, or town in which the source is to be located that the location and operation of the source are consistent with all ordinances adopted pursuant to Chapter 22 (§

15.2-2200

et seq.) of Title 15.2.

The governing body shall inform in writing the applicant and the Department of the source’s compliance or noncompliance not more than forty-five days from receipt by the chief executive officer, or his agent, of a request from the applicant.

Should the governing body fail to provide written notification as specified in subsection B of this section, the requirement for such notification as specified in subsection A of this section is waived.

The provisions of this section shall apply only to applications received after July 1, 1990.

History.

1990, c. 235; 1993, c. 739.

§ 10.1-1322.
(Effective until July 1, 2022) Permits.

Pursuant to regulations adopted by the Board and subject to §

10.1-1322.01

, permits may be issued, amended, revoked or terminated and reissued by the Department and may be enforced under the provisions of this chapter in the same manner as regulations and orders. Failure to comply with any condition of a permit shall be considered a violation of this chapter and investigations and enforcement actions may be pursued in the same manner as is done with regulations and orders of the Board under the provisions of this chapter. To the extent allowed by federal law, any person holding a permit who is intending to upgrade the permitted facility by installing technology, control equipment, or other apparatus that the permittee demonstrates to the satisfaction of the Director will result in improved energy efficiency, will reduce the emissions of regulated air pollutants, and meets the requirements of Best Available Control Technology shall not be required to obtain a new, modified, or amended permit. The permit holder shall provide the demonstration anticipated by this subsection to the Department no later than 30 days prior to commencing construction.

The Board by regulation may prescribe and provide for the payment and collection of annual permit program fees for air pollution sources. Annual permit program fees shall not be collected until (i) the federal Environmental Protection Agency approves the Board’s operating permit program established pursuant to Title V of the federal Clean Air Act or (ii) the Governor determines that such fees are needed earlier to maintain primacy over the program. The annual fees shall be based on the actual emissions (as calculated or estimated) of each regulated pollutant, as defined in § 502 of the federal Clean Air Act, in tons per year, not to exceed 4,000 tons per year of each pollutant for each source. The annual permit program fees shall not exceed a base year amount of $25 per ton using 1990 as the base year, and shall be adjusted annually by the Consumer Price Index as described in § 502 of the federal Clean Air Act. Permit program fees for air pollution sources who receive state operating permits in lieu of Title V operating permits shall be paid in the first year and thereafter shall be paid biennially. The fees shall approximate the direct and indirect costs of administering and enforcing the permit program, and of administering the small business stationary source technical and environmental compliance assistance program as required by the federal Clean Air Act. The Board shall also collect permit application fee amounts not to exceed $30,000 from applicants for a permit for a new major stationary source. The permit application fee amount paid shall be credited towards the amount of annual fees owed pursuant to this section during the first two years of the source’s operation. The fees shall be exempt from statewide indirect costs charged and collected by the Department of Accounts.

When adopting regulations for permit program fees for air pollution sources, the Board shall take into account the permit fees charged in neighboring states and the importance of not placing existing or prospective industry in the Commonwealth at a competitive disadvantage.

On or before January 1 of every even-numbered year, the Department shall make an evaluation of the implementation of the permit fee program and provide this evaluation in writing to the Senate Committee on Agriculture, Conservation and Natural Resources, the Senate Committee on Finance and Appropriations, the House Committee on Appropriations, the House Committee on Agriculture, Chesapeake and Natural Resources, and the House Committee on Finance. This evaluation shall include a report on the total fees collected, the amount of general funds allocated to the Department, the Department’s use of the fees and the general funds, the number of permit applications received, the number of permits issued, the progress in eliminating permit backlogs, and the timeliness of permit processing.

To the extent allowed by federal law and regulations, priority for utilization of permit fees shall be given to cover the costs of processing permit applications in order to more efficiently issue permits.

Fees collected pursuant to this section shall not supplant or reduce in any way the general fund appropriation to the Department.

The permit fees shall apply to permit programs in existence on July 1, 1992, any additional permit programs that may be required by the federal government and administered by the Board, or any new permit program required by the Code of Virginia.

The permit program fee regulations promulgated pursuant to this section shall not become effective until July 1, 1993.

[Expired.]

History.

1978, c. 818, § 10-17.30:1; 1988, c. 891; 1992, c. 488; 1993, c. 711; 1994, c. 227; 1995, c. 158; 2004, cc. 249, 324; 2005, c. 633; 2008, cc. 276, 557; 2012, c. 581.

Editor’s note.

For § 502 of the federal Clean Air Act, referred to in subsection B above, see
42 U.S.C.S. § 7661a.

Acts
2004, cc. 249 and
324, cls. 3 and 4 provide:

“3. That the regulations adopted by the State Air Pollution Control Board, the Virginia Waste Management Board, and the State Water Control Board to initially implement the provisions of this act shall be exempt from Article 2 ( § 2.2-4006 et seq.) of Chapter 40 of Title 2.2 of the Code of Virginia and shall become effective upon filing with the Registrar of Regulations. Thereafter, any amendments to the fee schedule shall not be exempted from Article 2 ( § 2.2-4006 et seq.).

“4. That it is the General Assembly’s intent that the Department of Environmental Quality (DEQ) shall evaluate and implement measures to improve the long-term effectiveness and efficiency of its programs in ensuring the Commonwealth’s air quality, water quality and land resources are protected and to ensure the maximum value from the funding provided for the Commonwealth’s environmental programs. To assist DEQ in accomplishing such goals, a management efficiency peer review shall be conducted of the Virginia Pollutant Discharge Elimination System permit programs and the air permit program implemented by the agency. The review shall evaluate (i) operational changes that would improve the efficiency and effectiveness of the agency’s operations, (ii) ways to reduce the costs of compliance, and (iii) the adequacy and appropriateness of staffing levels to meet state and federal requirements. The review shall be led by a consulting firm with expertise and previous experience in conducting similar reviews of state agencies and private firms and shall include a peer review team appointed by the Director of DEQ, consisting of individuals familiar with the permit program including, but not limited to, persons nominated by the Virginia Association of Counties, the Virginia Chemistry Council, the Virginia Manufacturers Association, the Virginia Municipal League, the Hampton Roads Planning District Commission, and the Virginia Association of Municipal Wastewater Agencies. All individuals serving on the peer review team shall have previous training and experience in preparing applications for permits issued under the Virginia Pollutant Discharge Elimination System Permit program or the air permitting program. The consulting firm shall be selected by agreement between the Director of DEQ and the peer review team members from the previously mentioned organizations and in accordance with the Virginia Procurement Act. The review shall be completed and a written report containing findings and recommendations for the implementation of any practices, procedures or other steps necessary to increase the efficiency of DEQ shall be forwarded to the members of the peer review team by September 15, 2006. The report shall include information, to the extent available, on whether or not the recommendations would change the level of environmental protection, the estimated savings to DEQ and the regulated community, and any barriers to implementation. The report and DEQ’s responses and plans for implementation of such recommendations shall be forwarded to the Chairmen of the House Committee on Agriculture, Chesapeake and Natural Resources, the House Committee on Appropriations, the Senate Committee on Agriculture, Conservation and Natural Resources, and the Senate Committee on Finance by October 15, 2006.”

Acts
2004, cc. 249 and
324, cls. 6 and 7 provide:

“6. That in order to accomplish the intent of the General Assembly, DEQ shall:

“a. Implement a streamlined permit application to be used for renewals of previously granted environmental permits where there has been no significant change in the permitted activity or applicable statutory or regulatory requirements during the previous permit term. Such streamlined permit renewal application shall be designed, to the extent not prohibited by federal law or regulation, to avoid the submission and duplication of information that has previously been submitted by the applicant and achieve maximum efficiency and economy for both the permittee and DEQ, and DEQ shall work with the peer review team to develop these applications with the goal of minimizing the amount of duplicate, costly work on the part of the permit renewal applicants and DEQ;

“b. Expeditiously implement electronic permitting, filing and reporting procedures so as to improve access to information, reduce the costs of compliance, and reduce costs to DEQ;

“c. Explore ways to reduce compliance costs to the permittee and reduce DEQ’s oversight costs for ensuring compliance. The options to be explored shall include, but not be limited to, increased utilization of certified evaluations (i.e., by professional engineers) as a method of ensuring compliance while reducing the need for physical inspections; and

“d. Encourage efficient and effective environmental performance by deeming a facility’s demonstration of a proven environmental management system, such as ISO 14001, along with a commitment to pollution prevention, annual progress reporting, and a record of sustained compliance as meeting the criteria for acceptance into DEQ’s programs for environmental excellence.

“7. That if general fund revenues in excess of $500,000 per year over the Governor’s submitted budget for natural resources for the 2004-2006 biennium are appropriated by the 2004 Appropriation Act and are allocated for implementation of the water permit programs, the water permit fees set forth in or established pursuant to this act shall be reduced by a pro rata basis.” No appropriation over and above was made; therefore there will be no fee reduction.

Acts
2008, cc. 276 and
557, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act do not apply to any permit action public noticed prior to July 1, 2008.”

Acts
2008, cc. 276 and
557, cl. 3 provides: “That regulatory actions necessary to implement the provisions of this act are exempt from Article 2 ( § 2.2-4006 et seq.) of the Administrative Process Act.”

Acts
2015, c. 80, which expires July 1, 2019, provides: “That carbon monoxide emissions from any diesel-powered incinerator that is installed prior to July 1, 2015, owned by a locality, and used exclusively for the incineration of animal carcasses collected from the public rights-of-way shall be exempt from the State Air Pollution Control Board’s air permitting minor new source review regulation requiring Best Available Control Technology for carbon monoxide emissions, including the emission limitations for carbon monoxide established as Best Available Control Technology.”

Acts
2020, c. 1289, as amended by Acts
2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 552, Item 378 B, effective for the biennium ending June 30, 2022, provides: “1. All of the permit program emissions fees collected by the State Air Pollution Control Board pursuant to
§

10.1-1322

, Code of Virginia, shall be assessed and collected on an annual basis notwithstanding the provisions of that section. The State Air Pollution Control Board shall adopt regulations adjusting permit program emissions fees collected pursuant to § 10.1- 1322, Code of Virginia, and establish permit application processing fees and permit maintenance fees sufficient to ensure that the revenues collected from fees cover the total direct and indirect costs of the program consistent with the requirements of Title V of the Clean Air Act, except that the initial adjustment to permit program emissions fees shall not be increased by more than 30 percent over current rates. Notwithstanding the provisions of
§

10.1-1322

, Code of Virginia, the permit application fees collected pursuant to this paragraph shall not be credited towards the amount of annual fees owed pursuant to
§ 10.1-1322, Code of Virginia. All of the fees adopted pursuant to this section shall be adjusted annually by the Consumer Price Index.

“2. The State Air Pollution Control Board shall adopt regulations to prohibit the sale, lease, rent, installation or entry into commerce in Virginia of any products or equipment that use or will use hydrofluorocarbons for the applications and end uses restricted by Appendix U and Appendix V of Subpart G of
40 C.F.R. Part 82, as those read on January 3, 2017. Notwithstanding the foregoing, such regulations shall not prohibit the use of hydrofluorocarbons in the manufacturing process by extruded polystyrene boardstock and billet manufacturers located in Virginia to produce products for sale and distribution outside of the Commonwealth, until the Board has solicited input from such manufacturers in order to determine and set by regulation a feasible date by which such manufacturers must be required to comply. In developing regulations, the Board shall solicit input from a workgroup of relevant stakeholders assembled by the Department.

“3. The regulations adopted by the State Air Pollution Control Board to initially implement the provisions of this item shall be exempt from Chapter 40 of Title 2.2, Code of Virginia, and shall become effective no later than July 1, 2021. Thereafter, any amendments to the fee schedule described by these acts shall not be exempted from Chapter 40 of Title 2.2, Code of Virginia.”

The Virginia Code Commission authorized the substitution of “Senate Committee on Finance and Appropriations” for “Senate Committee on Finance” in subsection D. March 10, 2021.

Acts
2022, c. 356, cl. 3 provides: “That any permits or orders issued by the Air Pollution Control Board or the State Water Control Board prior to the effective date of this act shall continue in full force and are enforceable by the Department of Environmental Quality.”

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendments by cc. 249 and 324 are identical, and inserted the seventh and eighth sentences in subsection B; substituted “Agriculture, Chesapeake” for “Conservation” in the first sentence of subsection D; and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 633, in subsection D, inserted “or before” preceding “January 1,” deleted “1993, and December 1” preceding “of every even-numbered year,” “thereafter” preceding “the Department shall make” and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendments by cc. 276 and 557 are identical, and inserted “and subject to §

10.1-1322.01

” following “adopted by the Board” near the beginning of subsection A.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendment by c. 581 added the third and fourth sentences of subsection A.

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendment by c. 356 in subsection A, deleted “and subject to §

10.1-1322.01

” following “Board” in the first sentence; and substituted “regulations of the Board and orders of the Department” for “regulations and orders of the Board” in the second sentence; substituted “promulgate regulations establishing” for “also collect” in subsection B in the third-to-last sentence; and substituted “Department” for “Board” in subsection G.

Law Review.

For 1994 survey of environmental law in Virginia, see 28 U. Rich. L. Rev. 1041 (1994).

For 2003/2004 survey of environmental law, see 39 U. Rich. L. Rev. 203 (2004).

§ 10.1-1322.
(Effective July 1, 2022) Permits.

Pursuant to regulations adopted by the Board, permits may be issued, amended, revoked or terminated and reissued by the Department and may be enforced under the provisions of this chapter in the same manner as regulations and orders. Failure to comply with any condition of a permit shall be considered a violation of this chapter and investigations and enforcement actions may be pursued in the same manner as is done with regulations of the Board and orders of the Department under the provisions of this chapter. To the extent allowed by federal law, any person holding a permit who is intending to upgrade the permitted facility by installing technology, control equipment, or other apparatus that the permittee demonstrates to the satisfaction of the Director will result in improved energy efficiency, will reduce the emissions of regulated air pollutants, and meets the requirements of Best Available Control Technology shall not be required to obtain a new, modified, or amended permit. The permit holder shall provide the demonstration anticipated by this subsection to the Department no later than 30 days prior to commencing construction.

The Board by regulation may prescribe and provide for the payment and collection of annual permit program fees for air pollution sources. Annual permit program fees shall not be collected until (i) the federal Environmental Protection Agency approves the Board’s operating permit program established pursuant to Title V of the federal Clean Air Act or (ii) the Governor determines that such fees are needed earlier to maintain primacy over the program. The annual fees shall be based on the actual emissions (as calculated or estimated) of each regulated pollutant, as defined in § 502 of the federal Clean Air Act, in tons per year, not to exceed 4,000 tons per year of each pollutant for each source. The annual permit program fees shall not exceed a base year amount of $25 per ton using 1990 as the base year, and shall be adjusted annually by the Consumer Price Index as described in § 502 of the federal Clean Air Act. Permit program fees for air pollution sources who receive state operating permits in lieu of Title V operating permits shall be paid in the first year and thereafter shall be paid biennially. The fees shall approximate the direct and indirect costs of administering and enforcing the permit program, and of administering the small business stationary source technical and environmental compliance assistance program as required by the federal Clean Air Act. The Board shall promulgate regulations establishing permit application fee amounts not to exceed $30,000 from applicants for a permit for a new major stationary source. The permit application fee amount paid shall be credited towards the amount of annual fees owed pursuant to this section during the first two years of the source’s operation. The fees shall be exempt from statewide indirect costs charged and collected by the Department of Accounts.

When adopting regulations for permit program fees for air pollution sources, the Board shall take into account the permit fees charged in neighboring states and the importance of not placing existing or prospective industry in the Commonwealth at a competitive disadvantage.

On or before January 1 of every even-numbered year, the Department shall make an evaluation of the implementation of the permit fee program and provide this evaluation in writing to the Senate Committee on Agriculture, Conservation and Natural Resources, the Senate Committee on Finance and Appropriations, the House Committee on Appropriations, the House Committee on Agriculture, Chesapeake and Natural Resources, and the House Committee on Finance. This evaluation shall include a report on the total fees collected, the amount of general funds allocated to the Department, the Department’s use of the fees and the general funds, the number of permit applications received, the number of permits issued, the progress in eliminating permit backlogs, and the timeliness of permit processing.

To the extent allowed by federal law and regulations, priority for utilization of permit fees shall be given to cover the costs of processing permit applications in order to more efficiently issue permits.

Fees collected pursuant to this section shall not supplant or reduce in any way the general fund appropriation to the Department.

The permit fees shall apply to permit programs in existence on July 1, 1992, any additional permit programs that may be required by the federal government and administered by the Department, or any new permit program required by the Code of Virginia.

The permit program fee regulations promulgated pursuant to this section shall not become effective until July 1, 1993.

[Expired.]

History.

1978, c. 818, § 10-17.30:1; 1988, c. 891; 1992, c. 488; 1993, c. 711; 1994, c. 227; 1995, c. 158; 2004, cc. 249, 324; 2005, c. 633; 2008, cc. 276, 557; 2012, c. 581; 2022, c. 356.